test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VVW_ikwe_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NA - VVW - kwe :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     kwe+NA: kwe
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+kwe+NA: ndakwe
     2+kwe+NA: gdakwe
     X+kwe+NA: dakwe
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     kwe+NA+Con: kwenh
     kwe+NA+Dim: kwens
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     kwe+NA+Pej: kwewish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     kwe+NA+Prt: kwewba
     kwe+NA+Voc+Pl: kwewdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     kwe+NA+4: kwewan
     kwe+NA+Loc: kweng
     kwe+NA+Pl: kwewag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+kwe+NA+Con: ndakwenh
     1+kwe+NA+Dim: ndakwens
     2+kwe+NA+Con: gdakwenh
     2+kwe+NA+Dim: gdakwens
     X+kwe+NA+Con: dakwenh
     X+kwe+NA+Dim: dakwens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos: ndakwem
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos: gdakwem
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos: dakwem
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+kwe+NA+Pej: ndakwewish
     2+kwe+NA+Pej: gdakwewish
     X+kwe+NA+Pej: dakwewish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+kwe+NA+1+Pl: ndakwenaa
     2+kwe+NA+1+Pl: gdakwenaa
     2+kwe+NA+2+Pl: gdakwewwaa
     3+kwe+NA+3+4: dakweni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+kwe+NA+Prt: ndakwewba
     1+kwe+NA+Voc+Pl: ndakwewdig
     2+kwe+NA+Prt: gdakwewba
     2+kwe+NA+Voc+Pl: gdakwewdig
     X+kwe+NA+Prt: dakwewba
     X+kwe+NA+Voc+Pl: dakwewdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+kwe+NA+4: ndakwewan
     1+kwe+NA+Loc: ndakweng
     1+kwe+NA+Pl: ndakwewag
     2+kwe+NA+4: gdakwewan
     2+kwe+NA+Loc: gdakweng
     2+kwe+NA+Pl: gdakwewag
     3+kwe+NA+4: dakwewan
     3+kwe+NA+Loc: dakweng
     X+kwe+NA+4: dakwewan
     X+kwe+NA+Loc: dakweng
     X+kwe+NA+Pl: dakwewag
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     kwe+NA+Con+Pej: kwenyish
     kwe+NA+Dim+Pej: kwensish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     kwe+NA+Con+Prt: kwenyba
     kwe+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: kwenydig
     kwe+NA+Dim+Prt: kwensba
     kwe+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: kwensdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     kwe+NA+Con+4: kwenyin
     kwe+NA+Con+Loc: kwenying
     kwe+NA+Con+Pl: kwenyig
     kwe+NA+Dim+4: kwensan
     kwe+NA+Dim+Loc: kwensing
     kwe+NA+Dim+Pl: kwensag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     kwe+NA+Pej+Prt: kwewshiba
     kwe+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: kwewshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     kwe+NA+Pej+4: kwewshan
     kwe+NA+Pej+Loc: kwewshing
     kwe+NA+Pej+Pl: kwewshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     kwe+NA+Prt+4: kwewbaniin
     kwe+NA+Prt+Loc: kwewbaniing
     kwe+NA+Prt+Pl: kwewbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos: ndakwenyim
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos: ndakwensim
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos: gdakwenyim
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos: gdakwensim
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos: dakwenyim
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos: dakwensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej: ndakwenyish
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej: ndakwensish
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej: gdakwenyish
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej: gdakwensish
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Pej: dakwenyish
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej: dakwensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl: ndakwenynaa
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl: ndakwensnaa
     2+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl: gdakwenynaa
     2+kwe+NA+Con+2+Pl: gdakwenywaa
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl: gdakwensnaa
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+2+Pl: gdakwenswaa
     3+kwe+NA+Con+3+4: dakwenyni
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+3+4: dakwensni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Prt: ndakwenyba
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: ndakwenydig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Prt: ndakwensba
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: ndakwensdig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Prt: gdakwenyba
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: gdakwenydig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Prt: gdakwensba
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: gdakwensdig
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Prt: dakwenyba
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: dakwenydig
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Prt: dakwensba
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: dakwensdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+4: ndakwenyin
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Loc: ndakwenying
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pl: ndakwenyig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+4: ndakwensan
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Loc: ndakwensing
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pl: ndakwensag
     2+kwe+NA+Con+4: gdakwenyin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Loc: gdakwenying
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pl: gdakwenyig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+4: gdakwensan
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Loc: gdakwensing
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pl: gdakwensag
     3+kwe+NA+Con+4: dakwenyin
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Loc: dakwenying
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+4: dakwensan
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Loc: dakwensing
     X+kwe+NA+Con+4: dakwenyin
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Loc: dakwenying
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Pl: dakwenyig
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+4: dakwensan
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Loc: dakwensing
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Pl: dakwensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej: ndakwemish
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej: gdakwemish
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej: dakwemish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: ndakwemnaa
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: gdakwemnaa
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl: gdakwemwaa
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+3+4: dakwemni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Prt: ndakwemba
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: ndakwemdig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Prt: gdakwemba
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gdakwemdig
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Prt: dakwemba
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: dakwemdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+4: ndakweman
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Loc: ndakweming
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pl: ndakwemag
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+4: gdakweman
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Loc: gdakweming
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pl: gdakwemag
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+4: dakweman
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Loc: dakweming
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+4: dakweman
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Loc: dakweming
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pl: dakwemag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl: ndakwewshinaa
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl: gdakwewshinaa
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+2+Pl: gdakwewshiwaa
     3+kwe+NA+Pej+3+4: dakwewshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+Prt: ndakwewshiba
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: ndakwewshidig
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+Prt: gdakwewshiba
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: gdakwewshidig
     X+kwe+NA+Pej+Prt: dakwewshiba
     X+kwe+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: dakwewshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+4: ndakwewshan
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+Loc: ndakwewshing
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+Pl: ndakwewshag
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+4: gdakwewshan
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+Loc: gdakwewshing
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+Pl: gdakwewshag
     3+kwe+NA+Pej+4: dakwewshan
     3+kwe+NA+Pej+Loc: dakwewshing
     X+kwe+NA+Pej+4: dakwewshan
     X+kwe+NA+Pej+Loc: dakwewshing
     X+kwe+NA+Pej+Pl: dakwewshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+kwe+NA+1+Pl+Prt: ndakwenaanba
     1+kwe+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndakwenaandig
     2+kwe+NA+1+Pl+Prt: gdakwenaanba
     2+kwe+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwenaandig
     2+kwe+NA+2+Pl+Prt: gdakwewwaaba
     2+kwe+NA+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwewwaadig
     3+kwe+NA+3+4+Prt: dakwenwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+kwe+NA+1+Pl+4: ndakwenaanin
     1+kwe+NA+1+Pl+Loc: ndakwenaaning
     1+kwe+NA+1+Pl+Pl: ndakwenaanig
     2+kwe+NA+1+Pl+4: gdakwenaanin
     2+kwe+NA+1+Pl+Loc: gdakwenaaning
     2+kwe+NA+1+Pl+Pl: gdakwenaanig
     2+kwe+NA+2+Pl+4: gdakwewwaan
     2+kwe+NA+2+Pl+Loc: gdakwewwaang
     2+kwe+NA+2+Pl+Pl: gdakwewwaag
     3+kwe+NA+2+Pl+4: dakwewwaan
     3+kwe+NA+2+Pl+Loc: dakwewwaang
     3+kwe+NA+3+4+4: dakwenwan
     3+kwe+NA+3+4+Loc: dakweniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Prt+4: ndakwewbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+Prt+Loc: ndakwewbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+Prt+Pl: ndakwewbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Prt+4: gdakwewbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+Prt+Loc: gdakwewbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+Prt+Pl: gdakwewbaniig
     3+kwe+NA+Prt+4: dakwewbaniin
     3+kwe+NA+Prt+Loc: dakwewbaniing
     X+kwe+NA+Prt+4: dakwewbaniin
     X+kwe+NA+Prt+Loc: dakwewbaniing
     X+kwe+NA+Prt+Pl: dakwewbaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: kwenyshiba
     kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: kwenyshidig
     kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: kwensshiba
     kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: kwensshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     kwe+NA+Con+Pej+4: kwenyshan
     kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: kwenyshing
     kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: kwenyshag
     kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+4: kwensshan
     kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: kwensshing
     kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: kwensshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6, 7
     kwe+NA+Con+Prt+4: kwenybaniin
     kwe+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: kwenybaniing
     kwe+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: kwenybaniig
     kwe+NA+Dim+Prt+4: kwensbaniin
     kwe+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: kwensbaniing
     kwe+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: kwensbaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6, 7
     kwe+NA+Pej+Prt+4: kwewshibniin
     kwe+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: kwewshibniing
     kwe+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: kwewshibniig
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: ndakwenymish
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: ndakwensmish
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: gdakwenymish
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: gdakwensmish
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: dakwenymish
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: dakwensmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: ndakwenyminaa
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: ndakwensminaa
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: gdakwenyminaa
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl: gdakwenymiwaa
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: gdakwensminaa
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl: gdakwensmiwaa
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4: dakwenymini
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4: dakwensmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: ndakwenymiba
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: ndakwenymidig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: ndakwensmiba
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: ndakwensmidig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: gdakwenymiba
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gdakwenymidig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: gdakwensmiba
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gdakwensmidig
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: dakwenymiba
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: dakwenymidig
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: dakwensmiba
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: dakwensmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: ndakwenyman
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: ndakwenyming
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: ndakwenymag
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: ndakwensman
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: ndakwensming
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: ndakwensmag
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: gdakwenyman
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: gdakwenyming
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: gdakwenymag
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: gdakwensman
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: gdakwensming
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: gdakwensmag
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: dakwenyman
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: dakwenyming
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: dakwensman
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: dakwensming
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: dakwenyman
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: dakwenyming
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: dakwenymag
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: dakwensman
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: dakwensming
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: dakwensmag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: ndakwenyshinaa
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: ndakwensshinaa
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: gdakwenyshinaa
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl: gdakwenyshiwaa
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: gdakwensshinaa
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl: gdakwensshiwaa
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+3+4: dakwenyshini
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4: dakwensshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6
